el: Προβλεπόμενη χρήση αγωνιστικού προστατευτικού θώρακα: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Καρτ; Motocross; Ορεινή ποδηλασία (DH); Snowmobile; Supercross; Άλλο
nl: Raceborstbeschermer beoogd gebruik: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Karten; Motorcross; Mountainbiken (DH); Sneeuwscooter; Supercross; Overig
fr: Usage prévu du plastron de course: VTT/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Karting; Motocross; VTT de descente (DH); Motoneige; Supercross; Autre
de: Vorgesehene Verwendung des Rennbrustschutzes: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Kartsport; Motocross; Mountainbiking (DH); Schneemobil; Supercross; Sonstige
fi: Rintasuojan käyttötarkoitus: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Karting; Motocross; Maastopyöräily (alamäki); Moottorikelkkailu; Supercross; Muu
es: Uso previsto del protector de pecho para carreras: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Karting; Motocross; Ciclismo de montaña (DH); Motonieve; Supercross; Otro
zh-CN: 赛车胸甲的预期用途: ATV/UTV; BMX; 耐力赛; 卡丁车; 越野摩托车; 山地自行车 (DH); 雪地摩托; 室内越野摩托车; 其他
ru: Назначение нагрудника для автоспорта: ATV/UTV; BMX; Эндуро; Картинг; Мотокросс; Маунтинбайк (даунхилл); Снегоход; Суперкросс; Другое
hu: Versenyzői mellkasvédő rendeltetésszerű felhasználása: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Gokart; Motokrossz; Hegyi kerékpározás (DH); Motoros szán; Szuperkrossz; Egyéb
nb: Tiltenkt bruk av brystbeskytter for racing: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Gokart; Motocross; Terrengsykling (DH); Snøscooter; Supercross; Annet
tr: Yarış göğüs koruyucusunun kullanım amacı: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Karting; Motokros; Dağ bisikleti (Tepe inişi); Kar motosikleti; Supercross; Diğer
pt-BR: Protetor peitoral de corrida uso pretendido: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Kart; Motocross; Mountain bike (DH); Snowmobile; Supercross; Outro
pt-PT: Utilização prevista do protetor de peito de corrida: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Karting; Motocross; BTT (DH); Mota de neve; Supercross; Outro
en: Racing chest guard intended use: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Karting; Motocross; Mountain biking (DH); Snowmobile; Supercross; Other
ja: レーシングチェストガードの用途: ATV/UTV; BMX; エンデューロ; カーティング; モトクロス; マウンテンバイク (DH); スノーモービル; スーパークロス; その他
cs: Zamýšlené použití chrániče hrudníku pro závodní účely: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Motokáry; Motokros; Horské kolo (sjezd); Sněžné skútry; Superkros; Jiné
sk-SK: Určené použitie pretekárskeho chrániča hrudníka: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Motokáry; Motokros; Horská cyklistika (DH); Snežné skútre; Superkros; Iné
ro-RO: Utilizarea prevăzută a protecției de piept pentru curse: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Karting; Motocross; Ciclism montan (DH); Snowmobil; Supercross; Altele
sl-SI: Namen dirkalnih ščitnikov za prsni koš: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Karting; Motokros; Gorsko kolesarstvo (DH); Motorne sani; Superkros; Drugo
it: Protezione toracica da corsa, uso previsto: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Karting; Motocross; Mountain bike (DH); Motoslitta; Supercross; Altro
bg-BG: Предназначение на състезателен протектор за гърди: ATV/UTV; BMX; Ендуро; Картинг; Мотокрос; Планинско колоездене (DH); Снегомобил; Суперкрос; Друго
zh-TW: 賽車胸部護具預定用途: ATV/UTV; BMX; 耐力賽; 卡丁車; 越野摩托車; 登山車 (下坡賽); 雪上摩托車; 摩托車超級越野賽; 其他
sv: Avsedd användning för bröstskydd i racing: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Karting; Motocross; Mountainbike (DH); Snöskoter; Supercross; Övrigt
ko: 레이싱용 가슴 보호대의 용도: ATV/UTV; BMX; 엔듀로; 카트; 모토크로스; 산악 자전거(DH); 스노모빌; 슈퍼크로스; 기타
hr-HR: Namjena štitnika za prsa za trkaće utrke: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Karting; Motocross; Brdski biciklizam (DH); Motorne sanjke; Supercross; Ostalo
th: วัตถุประสงค์การใช้อุปกรณ์ป้องกันหน้าอกสำหรับแข่งรถ: ATV/UTV; BMX; เอ็นดูโร่; รถคาร์ท; โมโตครอส; ปั่นจักรยานเสือภูเขา (DH); สโนว์โมบิล; ซูเปอร์ครอส; อื่นๆ
da: Tilsigtet anvendelse af brystbeskytter til racerløb: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Karting; Motocross; Mountainbike (DH); Snescooter; Supercross; Andet
lt-LT: Lenktyninės krūtinės apsaugos numatyta paskirtis: Keturračiai (ATV / UTV); BMX; Enduro; Kartingai; Motokrosas; Kalnų dviračiai (DH); Sniego motociklai; Superkrosas; Kita
pl: Zamierzone użycie ochraniacza klatki piersiowej do wyścigów: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Karting; Motocross; Kolarstwo górskie (DH); Skuter śnieżny; Supercross; Inne
vi: Mục đích sử dụng của tấm bảo vệ ngực dành cho đua xe: ATV/UTV; BMX; Enduro; Đua xe kart; Motocross; Đạp xe leo núi (DH); Xe trượt tuyết; Supercross; Khác